District of Columbia statutes.
32-1545

Effective date.

This chapter shall take effect on 60 days after the expiration of the District of Columbia Workers’ Compensation Act Emergency Amendment Act of 1982, after a 30-day period of Congressional review following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the Mayor, action by the Council of the District of Columbia to override the veto) as provided in § 1-206.02(c)(1).

History

July 1, 1980, D.C. Law 3-77, § 47, 27 DCR 2503
Apr. 22, 1982, D.C. Law 4-102, § 2, 29 DCR 1179

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-345.

References in Text

The “District of Columbia Workers’ Compensation Act Emergency Amendment Act of 1982,” referred to near the beginning of this section, is D.C. Act 4-160. Act 4-160 expired on May 26, 1982. Consequently, this chapter took effect on July 24, 1982.